North Carolina, session 2025, HB1035.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. TOWN OF PINK HILL – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the Town of Pink Hill, being Chapter
31 of the Private Laws of 1915, as amended by S.L. 2011-46, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3.1. In 2011 and quadrennially thereafter, the The governing body of the Town of Pink
Hill shall consist of a Mayor shall be elected for a four-year term. In 2011, and three
commissioners shall be elected, with the top vote getter receiving a four-year term and the two
persons receiving the next highest numbers of votes receiving two-year terms. In 2013 and
quadrennially thereafter, two commissioners shall be elected for four-year terms. In 2015 and
quadrennially thereafter, one commissioner shall be elected for a four-year term.elected to serve
staggered four-year terms."
SECTION 1.(b) The Charter of the Town of Pink Hill, being Chapter 31 of the
Private Laws of 1915, as amended by Chapter 221 of the Private Laws of 1933 and by S.L.
2011-46, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 3.2. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. The Mayor and commissioners shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality
basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and
conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes."
SECTION 1.(c) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Pink Hill, being Chapter 31
of the Private Laws of 1915, as amended by Chapter 221 of the Private Laws of 1933, is repealed.
SECTION 1.(d) Chapter 760 of the 1955 Session Laws is repealed.
SECTION 1.(e) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Pink Hill
in 2027. The terms of office for the Mayor and one commissioner in the Town of Pink Hill
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the two commissioners in the Town of Pink Hill
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Pink Hill shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
PART II. TOWN OF BOLIVIA – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS AND
FOUR-YEAR TERMS
SECTION 2.(a) Section 2 of the Charter of the Town of Bolivia, as reactivated by
Chapter 366 of the 1961 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2. On the first Monday in May 1963, and biennially thereafter, there shall be held in at
which time there shall be elected a Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the
general election in even-numbered years. The mayor and four aldermen who shall take office on
*H1035-v-6*

the first Tuesday in May next succeeding their election and shall be elected on a nonpartisan
plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292. The mayor and aldermen shall hold office for
two four years and until their successors are elected and qualified. The said Except as otherwise
provided, elections shall be held and conducted under the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 160
in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes
of North Carolina."
SECTION 2.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Bolivia
in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and four aldermen serving on the effective date of this
section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal
elections in the Town of Bolivia shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2028.
PART III. TOWN OF BELVILLE – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS AND
FOUR-YEAR TERM FOR MAYOR
SECTION 3.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Belville, being Chapter 84
of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. The regular Regular municipal election elections shall be held in November 1977,
and biennially thereafter for the election of a mayor and the members of the board of
commissioners. at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The election
mayor and members of the board of commissioners shall be elected on a nonpartisan and decided
by simple plurality and held at the time specified in G.S. 163-279(a)(1). plurality basis in
accordance with G.S. 163-292.
The municipal elections shall be held and conducted by the county board of elections and the
town shall reimburse the county board of elections for the cost thereof except the first election
required to be held herein. thereof. The elections shall be conducted in accordance with the
applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163
of the General Statutes of North Carolina, except as otherwise provided herein."
SECTION 3.(b) Section 5 of the Charter of the Town of Belville, being Chapter 84
of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 5. In the 1977 municipal election and biennially thereafter, the The mayor shall be
elected for a term of two four years. In the 1977 municipal election the two candidates for
commissioner receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of four years, and
the two candidates receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of two
years. Thereafter as the term of each member of the board of commissioners expires, his
successor shall be elected for a term of four years.Members of the board of commissioners shall
be elected to serve staggered four-year terms."
SECTION 3.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Belville
in 2027. The terms of office of the mayor and the two members of the board of commissioners
set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The terms of office of the two members of
the board of commissioners set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular
municipal elections in the Town of Belville shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in
2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the odd-numbered
years and with the mayor being elected to serve a four-year term.
PART IV. CITY OF NEW BERN – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS AND
FILLING OF UNFILLED VACANCIES BY SPECIAL ELECTION
SECTION 4.1.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the City of New Bern, being S.L.
2016-41, reads as rewritten:
"Section 3.1. Method of election. Regular municipal elections shall be held in the City every
four years at the time of the general election in odd-numbered years, and even-numbered years.
Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be held and conducted in accordance with general
the uniform laws of the State governing municipal elections. The Mayor and members of the
Page 2 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035

Board of Aldermen shall be elected according to the nonpartisan election and runoff method, as
provided in G.S. 163-293.plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 4.1.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of New
Bern in 2029. The terms of office of the Mayor and six aldermen serving on the effective date of
this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular
municipal elections in the City of New Bern shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in
2030.
SECTION 4.2.(a) Article III of the Charter of the City of New Bern, being S.L.
2016-41, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Section 3.6. Vacancies. Notwithstanding G.S. 160A-63, the remaining members of the
Board of Aldermen shall appoint a qualified person to fill a vacancy within 90 days of the
occurrence of the vacancy to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. Notwithstanding
G.S. 163-287, if the Board of Aldermen fail to appoint a qualified person in accordance with this
section, the county board of elections shall set a special election to fill the vacancy for the
remainder of the unexpired term. The county board of elections shall determine the date of the
special election, which shall be held within 180 days of the occurrence of the vacancy, and shall
have the authority to set a filing period in advance of the special election which filing period shall
be for no less than seven calendar days. The county board of elections shall publish legal notice
no less than 30 days prior to the special election with the date and time of the special election
and the precincts in which the special election shall be held."
SECTION 4.2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies occurring on or after that date.
PART V. TOWN OF EVERETTS – FOUR-YEAR TERMS
SECTION 5.(a) The Charter of the Town of Everetts, being Chapter 321 of the
Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 82 of the 1979 Session Laws, is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 3.1. The officers of the Town of Everetts shall consist of a mayor and three
commissioners. The mayor and three commissioners shall be elected to serve four-year terms.
Elections in the Town of Everetts shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis in
accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 5.(b) Sections 1, 2, and 3 of Chapter 82 of the 1979 Session Laws are
repealed.
PART VI. TOWN OF SNOW HILL – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR ELECTIONS
SECTION 6.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the Town of Snow Hill, being Chapter
58 of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3.1. Regular municipal elections; conduct and method of election.–Regular municipal
elections shall be held in the Town every two years in odd-numbered years and at the time of the
general election in each even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided, elections shall be
conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina. Members
The mayor and the members of the Board of Commissioners shall be elected according to the on
a nonpartisan plurality method of elections. Municipal elections shall be conducted by the County
Board of Elections.basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 6.(b) Section 2.2 of the Charter of the Town of Snow Hill, being Chapter
58 of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2.2. Board of commissioners; composition; terms of office.–The Board of
Commissioners shall be composed of five members, each of whom shall be elected for staggered
terms of four years in the manner provided by Article 3 of this Charter, provided they shall serve
until their successors are elected and qualified."
House Bill 1035 Session Law 2026-18 Page 3

SECTION 6.(c) Section 3.2 of the Charter of the Town of Snow Hill, being Chapter
58 of the 1977 Session Laws, is repealed.
SECTION 6.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Snow
Hill in 2027. The terms of office for the two commissioners in the Town of Snow Hill serving
on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by
one year. The terms of office for the mayor and the three commissioners in the Town of Snow
Hill serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Snow Hill shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
PART VII. TOWN OF COLUMBUS – FOUR-YEAR TERMS FOR MAYOR
SECTION 7.(a) Section 2.3 of the Charter of the Town of Columbus, being Chapter
46 of the 1985 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 2.3. Mayor; Term of Office; Duties. The Mayor shall be elected for a term of two
four years, or until his or her successor is elected and qualified; shall be the official head of the
Town government and preside at all meetings of the Council; shall have the right to vote only
when there is an equal division on any question or matter before the Council; and shall exercise
the powers and duties conferred by law or as directed by the Council."
SECTION 7.(b) The term of office for the Mayor for the Town of Columbus serving
on the effective date of this section whose term is set to expire in 2026 shall be extended by two
years. The Polk County Board of Elections shall not open the filing period for the office of Mayor
for the Town of Columbus in 2026 under G.S. 163-294.2.
SECTION 7.(c) Subsection (a) of this section is effective when it becomes law and
applies to elections held on or after that date. The remainder of this section is effective when it
becomes law.
PART VIII. TOWN OF RURAL HALL – UNAFFILIATED CANDIDATES AND
VACANCY FILLING PROCESS
SECTION 8.(a) The Charter of the Town of Rural Hall, being Chapter 1100 of the
1973 Session Laws, as amended by S.L. 2023-31 and by S.L. 2024-14, is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"Sec. 4.1. Any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office shall comply
with the requirements of Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, except that the date
and time petitions must be filed with the county board of elections shall be in accordance with
G.S. 163-122(a)(3)."
SECTION 8.(b) Section 5 of Chapter 1100 of the 1973 Session Laws, as amended
by S.L. 2023-31, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 5. (a) A regular municipal election shall be held in the Town of Rural Hall at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year. Candidates for election shall be
nominated at the same time and manner as county officers.
(b) Vacancies occurring for any reason in the council shall be filled for the unexpired
term by appointment by the remaining members of the council. A vacancy in the office of mayor
shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the council.
(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 160A-63, in filling a vacancy under subsection (b) of this
section, if the vacating official was elected as the nominee of a political party, then the individual
recommended by the county executive committee of that political party shall be appointed if the
county executive committee makes a recommendation within 30 days of the occurrence of the
vacancy and restricts voting to committee members who reside within the corporate limits of the
Town of Rural Hall."
Page 4 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035

SECTION 8.(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, for purposes of the
2026 election only, any candidate seeking nomination by petition for municipal office must file
a petition with the county board of elections no later than 12:00 noon on July 6, 2026. Except as
otherwise provided by this section, candidates shall comply with the requirements set out in
Article 11 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 8.(d) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective January 1, 2027,
and applies to elections held in 2028 and thereafter. Subsection (b) of this section is effective
when it becomes law and applies to vacancies occurring on or after that date. Subsection (c) of
this section is effective when it becomes law and applies to petitions filed on or after that date.
PART IX. CATAWBA COUNTY MUNICIPALITIES – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR
ELECTIONS
TOWN OF BROOKFORD
SECTION 9.1.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Brookford, being Chapter
230 of the Private Laws of 1907, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the The officers of the said corporation shall be a mayor, three commissioners
and such other officers and agents as may be appointed by the board of commissioners to enforce
their ordinances, keep their records, and otherwise aid in the conduct of the affairs of the town.
That until Tuesday after the first Monday in May, one thousand nine hundred and seven, T. J.
Leonard is appointed to the office of mayor of said town, and W. H. Shuford, J. W. Ballew and
C. E. Cole are appointed commissioners thereof; that the said mayor and commissioners shall
hold their offices until their successors are elected and qualified, as hereafter provided.Town of
Brookford shall consist of a mayor and four aldermen elected to serve staggered four-year terms."
SECTION 9.1.(b) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Brookford, being Chapter
230 of the Private Laws of 1907, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. That there shall be an election to the offices of mayor and commissioners of said
town on Tuesday after the first Monday in May, one thousand nine hundred and seven, and
biennially thereafter, under the same restrictions and regulations under which Shate and county
elections are held, and as provided by law for elections in cities and towns in North
Carolina.Regular municipal elections for officers shall be held at the time of the general election
in each even-numbered year. The election shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis in
accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 9.1.(c) Chapter 109 of the 1961 Session Laws is repealed.
SECTION 9.1.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Brookford in 2027. The terms of office for the two aldermen in the Town of Brookford serving
on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by
one year. The terms of office for the mayor and two aldermen in the Town of Brookford serving
on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by
one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Brookford shall resume in even-numbered
years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in
the odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF CATAWBA
SECTION 9.2.(a) The Charter of the Town of Catawba, being Chapter 274 of the
Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 333 of the 1951 Session Laws, Chapter 224 of the
1965 Session Laws, Town Ordinance No. 02-10 adopted on July 1, 2002, and Town Ordinance
No. 2006-15 adopted on November 6, 2006, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 3.1. The governing body for the Town of Catawba shall consist of a mayor and four
council members, elected to serve staggered four-year terms. Regular municipal elections shall
House Bill 1035 Session Law 2026-18 Page 5

be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and council
members shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292.
Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 9.2.(b) Sections 3 and 4 of the Charter of the Town of Catawba, being
Chapter 274 of the Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Chapter 333 of the 1951 Session Laws,
Chapter 224 of the 1965 Session Laws, Town Ordinance No. 02-10 adopted on July 1, 2002, and
Town Ordinance No. 2006-15 adopted on November 6, 2006, and referred to as Section 5 in the
current amended Town Code, are repealed.
SECTION 9.2.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of
Catawba in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and two council members in the Town of
Catawba serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall
be extended by one year. The terms of office for the two council members in the Town of
Catawba serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall
be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Catawba shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
CITY OF CLAREMONT
SECTION 9.3.(a) The Charter of the City of Claremont, being Chapter 11 of the
Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Town Ordinance adopted on February 3, 1976, is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 3.1. The governing body for the City of Claremont shall consist of a mayor and five
council members, elected to serve staggered four-year terms. Regular municipal elections shall
be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and council
members shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292.
Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform
municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 9.3.(b) Sections 3 and 4 of the Charter of the City of Claremont, being
Chapter 11 of the Private Laws of 1893, as amended by Town Ordinance adopted on February
3, 1976, are repealed.
SECTION 9.3.(c) The following acts are repealed:
(1) Chapter 76 of the 1961 Session Laws.
(2) Chapter 97 of the 1975 Session Laws.
(3) Section 2 of S.L. 2005-54.
SECTION 9.3.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of
Claremont in 2027. The terms of office for the three council members in the City of Claremont
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the mayor and two council members in the City of
Claremont serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall
be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Claremont shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
CITY OF CONOVER
SECTION 9.4.(a) Section 4.01 of the Charter of the City of Conover, being Chapter
78 of the 1977 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 16-96 adopted on July 8, 1996,
reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.01. Conduct of city elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time
of the general election in each even-numbered year. All elections for mayor and council members
shall be held on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the results determined by plurality as provided
Page 6 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035

in G.S. 163-279(a)(1). in accordance with G.S. 163-292. The term of office of the mayor shall
be four (4) years. The terms of office of councilmen council members shall be four years. At the
regular election in November, 1997, and quadrennially thereafter, two councilmen and the mayor
shall be elected. At the regular election in November, 1979, and quadrennially thereafter, three
councilmen shall be elected. The serve staggered four-year terms. Except as otherwise provided,
the elections for the City of Conover shall be held and conducted pursuant to the applicable
provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in
Chapter 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina."
SECTION 9.4.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Conover
in 2027. The terms of office for the three council members in the City of Conover serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the mayor and two council members in the City of Conover serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Conover shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.
CITY OF HICKORY
SECTION 9.5.(a) Section 2.01 of the Charter of the City of Hickory, being Chapter
323 of the 1961 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 404 of the 1967 Session Laws, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2.01. Composition, Election, and Terms of City Council; Time of General Election. (a)
The voters of the city shall elect The governing body for the City of Hickory shall consist of a
mayor and six aldermen. The mayor shall be nominated and elected at large. The aldermen shall
each reside in and represent a ward, but all aldermen shall be nominated and elected at large. The
candidate from each ward receiving the highest number of votes shall be declared elected. Except
as is otherwise provided in this Charter, no two aldermen shall be residents of the same ward. All
municipal elections shall be nonpartisan.No person shall be eligible to file for or be elected as an
alderman unless the person is a qualified voter and resident of the ward in which the person seeks
to be elected.
(b) A general municipal election shall be held annually on the first Monday in June of
1967, and on the first Monday in June of 1968. In 1970, and biennially thereafter, the general
municipal election shall be held on the first Monday in June.Regular municipal elections shall be
held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and aldermen
shall be elected using the nonpartisan primary and election method in accordance with
G.S. 163-294. The nonpartisan primary shall be held on the date provided by G.S. 163-1 for
county partisan primaries. Candidates shall file the notice of candidacy with the county board of
elections under the same schedule provided by G.S. 163-106.2. Except as otherwise provided,
the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter
163 of the General Statutes.
(c) The terms of all council members shall begin at the day and hour prescribed by
Section 3.03 of this Charter for the taking of the oath of office, and shall run for a period four
years, except for member's interim terms of three years for the next election of aldermen of the
fourth, fifth, and sixth wards. This Section shall apply to elections coming in 1967. Members The
mayor and aldermen shall be elected to serve staggered four-year terms and shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified. In the event that it is not possible otherwise to determine
which of two or more persons should be considered a hold-over alderman, decision shall be made
by lot between the aldermen who are willing to serve, the lots to be cast under the supervision of
the mayor and the remaining qualified aldermen."
House Bill 1035 Session Law 2026-18 Page 7

SECTION 9.5.(b) Section 2.51 through Section 2.58 and Section 2.71 through
Section 2.74 of the Charter of the City of Hickory, being Chapter 323 of the 1961 Session Laws,
as amended by Chapter 404 of the 1967 Session Laws, are repealed.
SECTION 9.5.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Hickory
in 2027. The terms of office for the three aldermen in the City of Hickory serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year. The
terms of office for the mayor and three aldermen in the City of Hickory serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. Regular
municipal elections in the City of Hickory shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in
2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the odd-numbered
years.
TOWN OF LONG VIEW
SECTION 9.6.(a) The Charter of the Town of Long View, being Chapter 430 of the
Private Laws of 1907, as amended by Chapter 131 of the Private Laws of 1929, Chapter 789 of
the 1955 Session Laws, and Chapter 616 of the 1961 Session Laws, is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"Sec. 3.1. (a) The governing body for the Town of Long View shall consist of a mayor and
five aldermen, elected to serve staggered four-year terms. Regular municipal elections shall be
held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year. The mayor and aldermen
shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as
otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.
(b) For the purpose of conducting elections for the five aldermen, the Town of Long View
shall be divided into five single-member districts, known as wards. Each alderman shall reside
in and represent one ward, but all aldermen shall be nominated and elected at large. No person
shall be eligible to file for or be elected as an alderman unless the person is a qualified voter and
resident of the ward in which the person seeks to be elected."
SECTION 9.6.(b) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Long View, being Chapter
430 of the Private Laws of 1907, as amended by Chapter 131 of the Private Laws of 1929 and
Chapter 789 of the 1955 Session Laws, is repealed.
SECTION 9.6.(c) Chapter 789 of the 1955 Session Laws is repealed.
SECTION 9.6.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Long
View in 2027. The terms of office for the three aldermen in the Town of Long View serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one
year. The terms of office for the mayor and two aldermen in the Town of Long View serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Long View shall resume in even-numbered
years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in
the odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF MAIDEN
SECTION 9.7.(a) The Charter of the Town of Maiden, being Chapter 103 of the
Private Laws of 1883, as amended by Chapter 5 of the Private Laws of 1885, Chapter 415 of the
Private Laws of 1905, Chapter 54 of the Private Laws of 1920, Chapter 350 of the Private Laws
of 1939, Chapter 445 of the 1955 Session Laws, Chapter 150 of the 1981 Session Laws, Chapter
346 of the 1983 Session Laws, Town Ordinance No. 3-76 adopted on April 5, 1976, and Town
Ordinance No. 11-2006 adopted on April 3, 2006, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 4.1. The governing body for the Town of Maiden shall consist of a mayor and five
council members. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the time of the general election in
each even-numbered year. The mayor and council members shall be elected on a nonpartisan
Page 8 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035

plurality basis in accordance with G.S. 163-292. The mayor shall be elected to serve a two-year
term. The council members shall be elected to serve staggered terms such that during each regular
municipal election, three council members shall be elected with the two candidates receiving the
first and second largest number of votes to serve four-year terms and the candidate receiving the
third largest number of votes to serve a two-year term. Except as otherwise provided, the election
shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 9.7.(b) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Maiden, being Chapter
103 of the Private Laws of 1883, as amended by Chapter 350 of the Private Laws of 1939,
Chapter 445 of the 1955 Session Laws, Town Ordinance No. 3-76 adopted on April 5, 1976, and
Town Ordinance No. 11-2006 adopted on April 3, 2006, is repealed.
SECTION 9.7.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Maiden
in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and three council members in the Town of Maiden
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for two council members in the Town of Maiden
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of Maiden shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
CITY OF NEWTON
SECTION 9.8.(a) Article III of the Charter of the City of Newton, being Chapter
1042 of the 1989 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 2002.29 adopted on July 10,
2002, reads as rewritten:
"ARTICLE III. GOVERNING BODY.
"Section 3.1. Structure of Governing Body; Number of Members. The Governing Body
of the City of Newton is the Council, which has six members, and the Mayor.
"Section 3.2. Manner of Election of Council. The qualified voters of the entire City elect
the members of the Council.
"Section 3.3. Term of Office of Members of the Council. Members of the Council are shall
be elected to serve staggered four-year terms. In 1991 and each four years thereafter, three
members of the Board shall be elected. In 1993 and each four years thereafter, three members of
the Board shall be elected.
"Section 3.4. Election of Mayor; Term of Office. The qualified voters of the entire City
elect the Mayor. A new Mayor shall be elected in 2003 and each four years thereafter.Mayor who
shall be elected to serve a four-year term."
SECTION 9.8.(b) Section 4.1 of the Charter of the City of Newton, being Chapter
1042 of the 1989 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Section 4.1. Conduct of City Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year. City officers shall be elected on a
nonpartisan basis and the results determined by plurality, as provided by G.S. 163-292. Except
as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 9.8.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Newton
in 2027. The terms of office for the mayor and three council members in the City of Newton
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be
extended by one year. The terms of office for the three council members in the City of Newton
serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be
extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Newton shall resume in
even-numbered years beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections
were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
House Bill 1035 Session Law 2026-18 Page 9

PART X. TOWN OF CONETOE – MAYOR VOTING AUTHORITY
SECTION 10.(a) Section 3.3.6 of the Charter of the Town of Conetoe, being Chapter
154 of the Private Laws of 1887, as amended, and as evidenced by the Code of Ordinances of
the Town of Conetoe adopted March 11, 2025, reads as rewritten:
"3.3.6 Mayor Not to Vote: Mayor's Voting Authority: The Mayor shall not may vote on any
question before the Board except in the case of a tie deadlocking decision of the Board of
Commissioners.Board."
SECTION 10.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
PART XI. IREDELL-STATESVILLE SCHOOLS BOARD OF EDUCATION
VACANCIES
SECTION 11.(a) Section 3.5(a) of S.L. 2015-35 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 3.5.(a) Notwithstanding the PLAN OF MERGER OF THE IREDELL
COUNTY AND STATESVILLE CITY SCHOOLS, as amended by Section 2 of S.L. 2002-18,
beginning in 2016, members of the Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education shall be
elected on a partisan basis at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year as terms
expire. Candidates for election to the Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of Education shall be
nominated at the same time and manner as other county officers. Members elected shall take
office and qualify on the first Monday in December of the year of their election and the terms of
their predecessors shall expire at that same time. Vacancies on the Iredell-Statesville Schools
Board of Education for positions elected on a partisan basis shall be filled in accordance with
G.S. 115C-37.1. If the vacancy is not filled in accordance with G.S. 115C-37.1 within 60 days
of the occurrence of the vacancy, the superintendent of the Iredell-Statesville Schools Board of
Education shall immediately report the vacancy to the clerk of superior court of the county. The
clerk of superior court shall appoint to fill the vacancy within 10 calendar days after receiving
notification from the superintendent, provided that the person appointed by the clerk of superior
court shall be all of the following:
(1) A voter registered with the same political party as the vacating member, if the
vacating member was elected as the nominee of a political party.
(2) A resident of the same electoral district as the vacating member, if the vacating
member was elected to represent an electoral district of less than the entire
school district."
SECTION 11.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies existing on or after that date.
PART XII. MCDOWELL COUNTY MUNICIPALITIES – EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR
ELECTIONS
CITY OF MARION
SECTION 12.1.(a) Section 3.1 of the Charter of the City of Marion, being Chapter
101 of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3.1. Regular municipal elections; conduct and method of election. Regular municipal
elections for officers shall be held in the City every two years in odd-numbered years and at the
time of the general election in each even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided, the
election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North
Carolina. The Mayor and members of the Council shall be elected according to the nonpartisan
plurality method of election.election in accordance with G.S. 163-292."
SECTION 12.1.(b) Section 2.2 of the Charter of the City of Marion, being Chapter
101 of the 1977 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
Page 10 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035

"Sec. 2.2. City Council; composition; terms of office. The City Council shall be composed
of five members, each of whom shall be elected for staggered terms of four years in the manner
provided by Article III of this Charter, provided they shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified."
SECTION 12.1.(c) Sections 3.2 and 3.3 of the Charter of the City of Marion, being
Chapter 101 of the 1977 Session Laws, are repealed.
SECTION 12.1.(d) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the City of Marion
in 2027. The terms of office for the two council members in the City of Marion serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the mayor and three council members in the City of Marion serving on
the effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one
year. Regular municipal elections in the City of Marion shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.
TOWN OF OLD FORT
SECTION 12.2.(a) Section 3 of the Charter for the Town of Old Fort, being Chapter
271 of the Private Laws of 1911, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the The officers of the said town shall consist of a mayor and five aldermen,
who, shall, biennially, on the first Monday in May, be elected by the qualified voters of the said
town. aldermen elected to serve staggered four-year terms."
SECTION 12.2.(b) Section 11 of Charter of the Town of Old Fort, being Chapter
271 of the Private Laws of 1911, reads as rewritten:
"That the The election for mayor and aldermen for said the town of Old Fort shall be held
and proceeded in as provided in chapter ninety of The Revisal of one thousand nine hundred and
five, and any all acts amending the same.at the time of the general election in each even-
numbered year. The mayor and aldermen shall be elected on a nonpartisan plurality basis in
accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 12.2.(c) Sections 5 and 10 of the Charter of the Town of Old Fort, being
Chapter 271 of the Private Laws of 1911, are repealed.
SECTION 12.2.(d) The following acts are repealed:
(1) Chapter 793 of the 1947 Sessions Laws.
(2) Chapter 389 of the 1953 Session Laws.
(3) Chapter 35 of the 1993 Session Laws.
SECTION 12.2.(e) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Old
Fort in 2027. The terms of office for the three aldermen in the Town of Old Fort serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year.
The terms of office for the mayor and two aldermen in the Town of Old Fort serving on the
effective date of this section whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year.
Regular municipal elections in the Town of Old Fort shall resume in even-numbered years
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.
House Bill 1035 Session Law 2026-18 Page 11

PART XIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 13. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law and applies to elections held on or after that date.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 24th day of June, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Mitchell S. Setzer
Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of
Representatives
Page 12 Session Law 2026-18 House Bill 1035